Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-1402
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Right to Shop Act:

(1) Allowed amount means the contractually agreed upon amount paid by an insurance carrier to a health care entity participating in the insurance carrier’s network or the amount the health plan is required to pay under the health plan policy or certificate of insurance for out-of-network covered benefits provided to the patient;

(2) Department means the Department of Insurance;

(3) Director means the Director of Insurance;

(4) Enrollee means an individual receiving health insurance coverage from an insurance carrier;

(5) Health care entity means:

(a) A facility licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act;

(b) A health care professional licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act; and

(c) An organization or association of health care professionals licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act;

(6) Incentive payment means a payment described in section 44-1407 that is made by an insurance carrier to an enrollee;

(7) Insurance carrier means any entity that provides health insurance in this state. Insurance carrier includes (a) an insurance company, (b) a fraternal benefit society, (c) a health maintenance organization, and (d) any other entity providing a plan of health insurance or health benefits subject to state insurance regulation;

(8) Shared savings incentive payment program means a program established by an insurance carrier pursuant to section 44-1407 to provide incentive payments to enrollees; and

(9) Shoppable health care service means a health care service for which an insurance carrier offers incentive payments under a shared savings incentive payment program established by the insurance carrier. Shoppable health care service includes, at a minimum, health care services in the following categories:

(a) Physical and occupational therapy services;

(b) Obstetrical and gynecological services;

(c) Radiology and imaging services;

(d) Laboratory services;

(e) Infusion therapy;

(f) Inpatient or outpatient surgical procedures; and

(g) Outpatient nonsurgical diagnostic tests or procedures.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 12.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.